Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 11. Action for Dwelling Design, Construction, or Remodeling Claims.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 5,
ch. 136, SLA 2003, the provisions of
AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

apply “to a claim if the contract for the work on which the claim is based was entered into on or after October 8, 2003.”

Sec. 09.45.881.
Notice of claim.

In an action brought on a claim against a construction professional, the claimant shall, at least 90 days before filing the action, serve written notice of the claim on the construction professional.

The notice of the claim in (a) of this section must state that the claimant asserts a claim against the construction professional for a defect in the design, construction, or remodeling of a dwelling and must describe the claim in reasonable detail sufficient to determine the general nature of the alleged defect and the results of the defect if known.

At the request of the construction professional, the claimant shall provide to the construction professional any evidence that the claimant possesses that depicts the nature and cause of the defect and the nature and extent of the repairs necessary to repair the defect, including expert reports, photographs, and videotapes.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Sec. 09.45.882.
Written response to notice of claim.

Within 21 days after service of the notice under AS

09.45.881

, the construction professional shall serve a written response on the claimant.

The written response under (a) of this section must state that the construction professional

offers to inspect the dwelling that is the subject of the claim within a specified time to determine if the construction professional will offer to repair the defect, will compromise and settle the claim by payment of money, or will dispute the claim;

offers to compromise and settle the claim by a payment of money without inspection; or

disputes the claim and will not repair the alleged defect or compromise and settle the claim by a payment of money.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Sec. 09.45.883.
Court action allowed if claim disputed or not responded to.

If the construction professional disputes the claim in the notice under AS

09.45.882(b)(3)

or does not respond to the claimant’s notice of claim within the time required by AS

09.45.882(a)

, the claimant may bring an action against the construction professional for the claim described in the notice of the claim made under AS

09.45.881

without further notice.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Sec. 09.45.884.
Consequence of rejecting inspection or settlement offer.

If the claimant rejects the inspection offer under AS

09.45.882(b)(1)

or the settlement offer under AS

09.45.882(b)(2)

, the claimant shall serve written notice of the claimant’s rejection on the construction professional.

The notice under (a) of this section must include the basis for the claimant’s rejection of the construction professional’s offer.

After service of the rejection notice required by (a) of this section, the claimant may bring an action against the construction professional for the claim described in the notice of claim made under AS

09.45.881

without further notice.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Sec. 09.45.885.
Consequence of accepting inspection offer.

If a claimant elects to allow the construction professional to make an inspection under AS

09.45.882(b)(1)

, the claimant shall provide the construction professional and its contractors or other agents reasonable access to the claimant’s dwelling during normal working hours to inspect the dwelling and the alleged defect to determine the nature and cause of the alleged defect and the nature and extent of any repairs necessary to repair the alleged defect.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Sec. 09.45.886.
Procedure after inspection.

Within 14 days after completion of an inspection made under AS

09.45.885

, the construction professional shall serve on the claimant a written

offer to repair the defect without charge to the claimant; the offer must include a report of the scope of the inspection, the findings and results of the inspection, a description of any repairs necessary to repair the defect, and a schedule for the completion of the repairs;

offer to compromise and settle the claim by a payment of money under AS

09.45.882(b)(2)

; or

statement that the construction professional will not repair the defect.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Sec. 09.45.887.
Court action allowed after failure to repair or to settle.

If the construction professional does not respond within the time required by AS

09.45.886

, does not repair the defect to the satisfaction of the claimant within the time agreed under AS

09.45.886

(1), does not provide an offer under AS 09.45.886(2), or serves a statement under AS 09.45.886(3), the claimant may bring an action against the construction professional for the claim described in the notice of claim without further notice.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Sec. 09.45.888.
Court action allowed if claimant rejects offer.

If the claimant rejects an offer made by the construction professional under AS

09.45.886

(1) or (2), the claimant shall serve written notice of the claimant’s rejection on the construction professional that includes the basis for the claimant’s rejection of the construction professional’s offer.

After service of the notice under (a) of this section, the claimant may bring an action against the construction professional for the claim described in the notice of claim made under AS

09.45.881

without further notice.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Sec. 09.45.889.
Unreasonable rejection of offer.

If a claimant unreasonably rejects an offer made under AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

or does not give the construction professional a reasonable opportunity to repair the defect under an accepted offer of settlement, the claimant may not recover an amount that exceeds

the reasonable cost of the repairs offered under AS

09.45.886

(1) that are necessary to cure the defect and that are the responsibility of the construction professional; or

the amount of a reasonable settlement offer of money that was made under AS

09.45.886

(2).

If a claimant unreasonably rejects a construction professional’s offer made under AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

or does not give the construction professional a reasonable opportunity to repair the defect under an accepted offer of settlement, the court may deny the claimant an award of attorney fees and costs and may award attorney fees and costs to the construction professional.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For effect of subsection (b) of this section on Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure 79 and 82, see § 4,
ch. 136, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 09.45.890.
Acceptance of offer.

To accept an offer of a construction professional to repair a defect under AS

09.45.886

(1), a claimant shall serve the construction professional with a written notice of acceptance within a reasonable period of time, not to exceed 30 days, after receiving the offer.

A claimant who accepts an offer under (a) of this section shall provide the construction professional and its contractors or other agents reasonable access to the claimant’s dwelling during normal working hours to perform the repairs by the time stated in the offer.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Sec. 09.45.891.
Presumption of mitigation.

If a claimant fails to allow a construction professional to make a reasonable inspection requested by the construction professional under AS

09.45.882(b)(1)

, or fails to provide a good faith written response to a construction professional’s offer under AS

09.45.882(b)(2)

or

09.45.886

(1) or (2), the failure establishes a rebuttable presumption that the claimant’s damages could have been mitigated.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Sec. 09.45.892.
Noncompliance assertion prohibited.

Unless there is good cause for the failure, a construction professional may not assert that the claimant did not comply with AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

if the construction professional fails to respond in good faith to the claimant’s notice of claim made under AS

09.45.881

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Sec. 09.45.893.
Notice required in contract.

In order to take advantage of any rights of a construction professional under AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

, when a construction professional enters into a contract with another person to design, construct, or remodel a dwelling, the construction professional shall give the person a notice of the construction professional’s right to offer to cure a defect before the person may file an action in court against the construction professional.

The notice required by (a) of this section must be included on a separate page attached to the contract and must contain a title at the top of the page that reads “Notice of Potential Claims Must Be Provided within One Year.” This form shall be signed by the purchaser or purchaser’s authorized representative. The signature of either spouse to a design, construction, or remodeling contract shall be considered to be the authorization of both spouses.

The notice required by (a) of this section must be conspicuous and must be in substantially the following form:

ALASKA LAW AT AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

CONTAINS IMPORTANT REQUIREMENTS THAT YOU MUST FOLLOW BEFORE YOU MAY FILE A COURT ACTION FOR DEFECTIVE DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, OR REMODELING AGAINST THE DESIGNER, BUILDER, OR REMODELER OF YOUR HOME. WITHIN ONE YEAR OF THE DISCOVERY OF A DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, OR REMODELING DEFECT, BEFORE YOU FILE A COURT ACTION, YOU MUST DELIVER TO THE DESIGNER, BUILDER, OR REMODELER A WRITTEN NOTICE OF ANY DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, OR REMODELING CONDITIONS YOU ALLEGE ARE DEFECTIVE IN ORDER TO PROVIDE YOUR DESIGNER, BUILDER, OR REMODELER WITH THE OPPORTUNITY TO MAKE AN OFFER TO REPAIR OR PAY FOR THE DEFECTS. YOU ARE NOT OBLIGATED TO ACCEPT ANY OFFER MADE BY THE DESIGNER, BUILDER, OR REMODELER. THERE ARE STRICT DEADLINES AND PROCEDURES UNDER STATE LAW, AND FAILURE TO FOLLOW THEM MAY AFFECT YOUR RIGHT TO FILE A COURT ACTION. ALASKA LAW AT AS

09.45.895

CONTAINS LIMITATIONS TO THE AMOUNT OF DAMAGES THAT MAY BE RECOVERED IN A COURT ACTION FOR DEFECTIVE DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, OR REMODELING.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 2004)

Sec. 09.45.894.
Additional construction defects; additional notice of claim required.

A court action for a defect that is discovered after a claimant has provided a construction professional with a notice of claim required in AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

may not be commenced until the claimant has complied with the provisions of AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Sec. 09.45.895.
Limitation on damages; collateral sources.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, in an action covered under AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

, a claimant may recover only the following damages caused by a defect:

the reasonable cost of repairs necessary to cure a defect, or actual damages that result from the construction defect, including reasonable and necessary engineering or consulting fees required to evaluate and cure the defect, that the construction professional is responsible for repairing;

the reasonable expenses of temporary housing reasonably necessary during the repair period;

the reduction in market value, if any, to the extent that the reduction is due to the defect; and

reasonable and necessary attorney fees and costs.

In an action under AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

, a court shall deduct from the compensation awarded to a claimant any compensation paid to the claimant under a homeowner’s warranty contract or a homeowner’s insurance policy as compensation for the defects that are the subject of the action. The amount of this deduction does not include any compensation paid by the construction professional to the claimant to satisfy the claim, any compensation paid under an insurance policy issued to the construction professional to satisfy the claim, or any amount the claimant is required to repay under the terms of the homeowner’s warranty contract or homeowner’s insurance policy.

Subsections (a) and (b) of this section do not apply if the defect was caused by gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct by the construction professional.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 25 SLA 2004)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 25, SLA 2004 sets out the applicability of the 2004 repeal and reenactment of this section by directing that the provision as reenacted applies “to an action covered under AS

09.45.881

-

09.45.899

that accrues on or after July 1, 2004.” See § 3, ch. 125, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary & Special Acts.

Sec. 09.45.896.
Exemption.

AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

do not apply to claims for personal injury, including death.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Sec. 09.45.899.
Definitions.

In AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

,

“action” means a civil action or an arbitration proceeding for damages or indemnification;

“claim” means a claim against a construction professional concerning a defect in the design, construction, or remodel of a dwelling;

“claimant” means a person who owns or is purchasing a dwelling and who asserts a claim;

“construction professional” means a registered contractor, architect, or engineer who is engaged in the business of designing, constructing, or remodeling a dwelling; in this paragraph, “contractor” has the meaning given in AS

08.18.171

;

“dwelling” means a single-family house, a duplex, or a multi-family housing unit, and the mechanical and other systems, the other components, and all improvements that are part of the house, duplex, or housing unit when the dwelling is constructed or remodeled; for purposes of this paragraph, “multi-family housing unit” means

an individual housing unit in a multi-family housing facility; and

the interest of the owner of an individual housing unit in the common areas and improvements of a multi-family housing facility;

“multi-family housing facility” means a residential horizontal property regime organized under AS 34.07, a residential condominium organized under AS 34.08, and a residential cooperative organized under AS 10.15;

“remodel” means a change to a dwelling if the change has a value that is more than 25 percent of the value of the structure being changed;

“serve” means to deliver by personal service or by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the addressee.

History.

(§ 3 ch 136 SLA 2003)